Maryland, session 2025, HB1299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “Western Maryland” means Allegany County and Garrett
County.
(b) The Department of Natural Resources shall:
(1) study the biological carrying capacity and cultural carrying capacity of
elk in Western Maryland; and
(2) on or before October 1, 2026, report its findings and recommendations
to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly on whether elk should be reintroduced in Western Maryland.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1299*